zh-CN: 电子产品 > 计算机 > 轻薄/零硬件客户端: 瘦客户端计算机; 零客户端计算机
de: Elektronik > Computer > Thin Clients & Zero Clients: Thin-Client-Computer; Zero-Client-Computer
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Máy vi tính > Máy trạm không xử lý và máy trạm nhỏ: Máy tính công nghệ Thin Client; Máy tính công nghệ Zero Client
da: Elektronik > Computere > Tynde klienter og nulklienter: Tynde klientcomputere; Klientløste computere
ja: 電子機器 > コンピューター > シンクライアント・ゼロクライアント: シンクライアントコンピューター; ゼロクライアントコンピューター
pl: Elektronika > Komputery > Komputery typu cienki klient i zerowy klient: Komputery typu cienki klient; Komputery typu klient zerowy
fi: Elektroniikka > Tietokoneet > Kevyet asiakaspäätteet: Thin Client -laitteet; Zero Client -laitteet
lt-LT: Elektronika > Kompiuteriai > Mažafunkciai ir nuliniai klientiniai kompiuteriai: Mažafunkciai klientiniai kompiuteriai; Nuliniai klientiniai kompiuteriai
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Υπολογιστές > Υπολογιστές-πελάτες Thin & Zero: Υπολογιστές Thin Client; Υπολογιστές Zero Client
hu: Elektronika > Számítógépek > Vékony és zéró kliensek: Vékonykliens-számítógépek; Zérókliens-számítógépek
en: Electronics > Computers > Thin & Zero Clients: Thin Client Computers; Zero Client Computers
nb: Elektronikk > Datamaskiner > Tynn- og nullklienter: Tynnklient-datamaskiner; Nullklient-datamaskiner
fr: Appareil électronique > Ordinateurs > Clients légers et zéro: Clients légers; Clients zéro
it: Elettronica > Computer > Thin client e zero client: Computer thin client; Computer zero client
sl-SI: Elektronika > Računalniki > Tanki in ničelni odjemalci: Računalniki s tankimi odjemalci; Računalniki z ničelnimi odjemalci
hr-HR: Elektronika > Računala > Tanki i nulti klijenti: Računala s tankim klijentima; Računala s nultim klijentima
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > คอมพิวเตอร์ > Thin และ Zero Clients: คอมพิวเตอร์แบบ Thin Client; คอมพิวเตอร์แบบ Zero Client
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電腦 > 精簡型/極簡型電腦: 精簡型用戶端電腦; 零用戶端電腦
tr: Elektronik > Bilgisayarlar > Thin ve Zero Client'lar: Küçük İstemcili Bilgisayarlar; İstemcisiz Bilgisayarlar
bg-BG: Електроника > Компютри > Тънки и нулеви клиенти: Компютри тип тънък клиент; Компютри тип нулев клиент
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Computadores > Thin clients e zero clients: Computadores thin client; Computadores zero client
nl: Elektronica > Computers > Thin- en zeroclients: Thin Client-computers; Zero Client-computers
ru: Электроника > Компьютеры > Тонкие и нулевые клиенты: Тонкие клиенты; Нулевые клиенты
cs: Elektronika > Počítače > Tencí a nuloví klienti: Počítače typu tenký klient; Počítače typu nulový klient
sk-SK: Elektronika > Počítače > Tenkí a nuloví klienti: Počítače typu tenkého klienta; Počítače typu nulového klienta
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Computadores > Clientes Thin e clientes Zero: Computadores de cliente Thin; Computadores de cliente Zero
sv: Elektronik > Datorer > Tunna klienter och nollklienter: Tunna klientdatorer; Zero klientdatorer
ko: 전자기기 > 컴퓨터 > 씬/제로 클라이언트: 씬 클라이언트 컴퓨터; 제로 클라이언트 컴퓨터
es: Electrónica > Computadoras > Clientes livianos y delgados: Computadoras Thin Client; Computadoras Zero Client
ro-RO: Electronice > Calculatoare > Calculatoare Thin Client și Zero Client: Calculatoare Thin Client; Calculatoare Zero Client